test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-even_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Evensyllable nouns belonging to GOAHTI-A, GOAHTI-I, GOAHTI-U, GOAHTI, PROFIILA, GOAHTILONG, GOAHTILONGSHORT, ALBMI, ALBMILONG, ALBMILONGSHORT, BEALLE, AIGI, BASSI, EADNI, VALDI, RAFI, STAHTA, IIJA, STRUKTUR, KULTUR, MAŠIIDNA, BENSIN, GADDI, GADDISHORT, LUONDU, ADRENALIN, TELEFON, SOSIAL, GARGIA, BUFFALO, ESSAYA, JOHTOLAT, UPMI, EAPMI, BUVSSAT

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # GOAHTI-A
    bietna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: bietna-
    bietna+N+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bietname
    bietna+N+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bienainan
    bietna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bienainan
    bietna+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bienainam
    bietna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bienainam
    bietna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bienaideameguin
    bietna+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bienaideameguin
    bietna+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bienaineameguin
    bietna+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bienaineameguin
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: bienažiin
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: bienažiinna
    bietna+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bienalažžan
    bietna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bienaheapme
    bietna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [bienahin, bienaheapmi]

    
  Noun - beaivi: # GOAHTI-I
    beaivi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: beaive-
    beaivi+N+Sg+Nom: beaivi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen: beaivvi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: beaivve
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beaiváme
    beaivi+N+Sg+Ill: beaivái
    beaivi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: beivviinan
    beaivi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: beivviinan
    beaivi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: beivviinam
    beaivi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: beivviinam
    beaivi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: beivviideameguin
    beaivi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: beivviideameguin
    beaivi+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: beivviineameguin
    beaivi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: beivviineameguin
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: beaivvážiin
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: beaivvážiinna
    beaivi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: beaivválažžan
    beaivi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [beaivveheapme, beaivviheapme]
    beaivi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [beaivvehin, beaivveheapmi, beaivvihin, beaivviheapmi]



  Noun - joavku: # GOAHTI-U
    joavku+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: joavko-
    joavku+N+Sg+Nom: joavku
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen: joavkku
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: joavkko
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: jovkome
    joavku+N+Sg+Ill: jovkui
    joavku+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: joavkkuinan
    joavku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: joavkkuinan
    joavku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: joavkkuinam
    joavku+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: joavkkuinam
    joavku+N+Pl+Com: joavkkuiguin
    joavku+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: joavkkuiguin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: joavkkuideameguin
    joavku+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: joavkkuideameguin
    joavku+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: joavkkuineameguin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: joavkkuineameguin
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: jovkkožiin
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: jovkkožiinna
    joavku+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: jovkkolažžan
    joavku+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [joavkkuheapme, joavkkoheapme]
    joavku+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [joavkkuhin, joavkkuheapmi, joavkkohin, joavkkoheapmi]



  Noun - bánno: # GOAHTI
    bánno+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: bánno-
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Nom: bánno
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Gen: bánno
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bánnome
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Ill: bánnui
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bánnuinan
    bánno+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bánnuinan
    bánno+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bánnuinam
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bánnuinam
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Com: bánnuiguin
    bánno+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: bánnuiguin
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bánnuideameguin
    bánno+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bánnuideameguin
    bánno+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bánnuineameguin
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bánnuineameguin
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: bánnožiin
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: bánnožiinna
    bánno+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bánnolažžan
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bánnoheapme
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [bánnohin, bánnoheapmi]



  Noun - stensiila: # PROFIILA
    stensiila+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: stensiila-
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: stensel-
    stensiila+N+Sg+Nom: stensiila
    stensiila+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: stensila
    stensiila+N+Sg+Gen: stensiilla
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: [stensiila, stensila]
    stensiila+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: stensiilame
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: stensilame
    stensiila+N+Sg+Ill: stensiilii
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: stensilii
    stensiila+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: stensiillainan
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [stensiillainan, stensiilainan, stensilainan]
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [stensiillainam, stensiilainam, stensilainam]
    stensiila+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: stensiillainam
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [stensiilainam, stensilainam]
    stensiila+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: stensiillaideameguin
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: [stensiillaideameguin, stensiilaideameguin, stensilaideameguin]
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: [stensiillaineameguin, stensiilaineameguin, stensilaineameguin]
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: [stensiilaineameguin, stensilaineameguin]
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: stensilainan
    stensiila+N+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: [stensiilaideameguin, stensilaideameguin]
    stensiila+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: stensiillaineameguin

  Noun - johtu: # GOAHTILONG
    johtu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: johtu-
    johtu+N+Sg+Nom: johtu
    johtu+N+Sg+Gen: jođu
    johtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: johtome
    johtu+N+Sg+Ill: johtui
    johtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: jođuinan
    johtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: jođuinan
    johtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: jođuinam
    johtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: jođuinam
    johtu+N+Pl+Com: jođuiguin
    johtu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: jođuiguin
    johtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: jođuideameguin
    johtu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: jođuideameguin
    johtu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: jođuineameguin
    johtu+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: jođuineameguin
    johtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: jođožiin
    johtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: jođožiinna
    johtu+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: jođolažžan
    johtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [jođuheapme, jođoheapme]
    johtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [jođuhin, jođuheapmi, jođohin, jođoheapmi]



  Noun - linjá: # GOAHTILONGSHORT
    linjá+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: [linjá-, linja-]
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: linjjá-
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom: linjá
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Nom: linjjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen: linjjá
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Gen: linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: linjáme
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: linjjáme
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill: linjái
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: linjjái
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Ill: linjjái
    linjá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: linjjáinan
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: linjáinam
    linjá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: linjjáinan
    linjá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: linjjáinam
    linjá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: linjjáinam
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: linjáinam
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: linjáinan
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: linjáinan
    linjá+N+Pl+Com: linjjáiguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Pl+Com: linjáiguin
    linjá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: linjjáiguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: linjáiguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: linjjáideameguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: linjáideameguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: linjáideameguin
    linjá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: linjjáideameguin
    linjá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: linjjáineameguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: linjjáineameguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: linjáineameguin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: linjáineameguin
    linjá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: linjjážiin
    linjá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: linjjážiinna
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: linjážiin
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: linjážiinna
    linjá+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: linjjálažžan
    linjá+Err/Orth+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: linjálažžan
    linjá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: linjjáheapme
    linjá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [linjjáhin, linjjáheapmi]



  Noun - diehtu: # ALBMI
    diehtu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: diehto-
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: diehtu-
    diehtu+N+Sg+Nom: diehtu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Allegro: dieđo
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Err/Orth: dieđo
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: dihtome
    diehtu+N+Sg+Ill: dihtui
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: diehtui
    diehtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dieđuinan
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dieđuinan
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: dieđuinam
    diehtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: dieđuinam
    diehtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dieđuideameguin
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dieđuideameguin
    diehtu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: dieđuineameguin
    diehtu+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: dieđuineameguin
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: diđožiin
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: diđožiinna
    diehtu+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: diđolažžan
    diehtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dieđuheapme
    diehtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [dieđuhin, dieđuheapmi]



  Noun - skierbmá: # ALBMILONG
    skierbmá+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: skierbmá-
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Nom: skierbmá
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Gen: skierpmá
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: skierbmáme
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Ill: skierbmái
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: skierpmáinan
    skierbmá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: skierpmáinan
    skierbmá+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: skierpmáinam
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: skierpmáinam
    skierbmá+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: skierpmáideameguin
    skierbmá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: skierpmáideameguin
    skierbmá+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: skierpmáineameguin
    skierbmá+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: skierpmáineameguin
    skierbmá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: skierpmážiin
    skierbmá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: skierpmážiinna
    skierbmá+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: skierpmálažžan
    skierbmá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: skierpmáheapme
    skierbmá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [skierpmáhin, skierpmáheapmi]



  Noun - liššá: # ALBMILONGSHORT
    liššá+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: [liššá-, lišša-]
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Nom: liššá
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Gen: liššá
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: liššáme
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Ill: liššái
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: liššáinan
    liššá+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1: liššáinan
    liššá+N+G3+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: liššáinam
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: liššáinam
    liššá+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: liššáideameguin
    liššá+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+PxDu1: liššáideameguin
    liššá+N+G3+Err/Orth+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: liššáineameguin
    liššá+N+G3+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: liššáineameguin
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: liššážiin
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: liššážiinna
    liššá+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: liššálažžan
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: liššáheapme
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [liššáhin, liššáheapmi]


    
